Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.220

Washington professional educator standards board—Performance standards and professional-level certification assessment—Basic skills assessment—Assessment of subject knowledge—Administration of section—Rule-making authority.

(1)(a) The Washington professional educator standards board shall make available a means of assessing an applicant's knowledge in the basic skills. For the purposes of this section, "basic skills" means the subjects of at least reading, writing, and mathematics. An applicant must take this basic skills assessment, or an alternative or equivalent basic skills assessment as determined by the Washington professional educator standards board, and report the individual results to the Washington professional educator standards board and an approved teacher preparation program, for admission to the approved teacher preparation program.

(b) An approved teacher preparation program may use the results of the basic skills assessment, or an alternative or equivalent basic skills assessment as determined by the Washington professional educator standards board, as a formative assessment of academic strengths and weakness in determining the candidate's readiness for the program.

(c) The Washington professional educator standards board may establish criteria to ensure that persons from out-of-state who are applying for residency certification and persons applying to master's degree level teacher preparation programs can demonstrate to the board's satisfaction that they have the requisite basic skills.

(d) The Washington professional educator standards board may identify and accept other tests and test scores as long as the tests are comparable in rigor to the basic skills assessment and candidates meet or exceed the basic skills requirements established by the board.

(2) The Washington professional educator standards board shall set performance standards and develop, pilot, and implement a uniform and externally administered professional-level certification assessment based on demonstrated teaching skill. In the development of this assessment, consideration shall be given to changes in professional certification program components such as the culminating seminar.

(3) Beginning not later than September 1, 2002, the Washington professional educator standards board shall provide for the initial piloting and implementation of a means of assessing an applicant's knowledge in the subjects for which the applicant has applied for an endorsement to his or her residency or professional teaching certificate. The assessment of subject knowledge shall not include instructional methodology. Beginning September 1, 2005, passing this assessment shall be required to receive an endorsement for certification purposes.

(4) The Washington professional educator standards board may permit exceptions from the assessment requirements under subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section on a case-by-case basis.

(5) The Washington professional educator standards board shall provide for reasonable accommodations for individuals who are required to take the assessments in subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section if the individuals have learning or other disabilities.

(6) With the exception of applicants exempt from the requirements of subsections (2) and (3) of this section, an applicant must achieve a minimum assessment score or scores established by the Washington professional educator standards board on each of the assessments under subsections (2) and (3) of this section.

(7) The Washington professional educator standards board and superintendent of public instruction, as determined by the Washington professional educator standards board, may contract with one or more third parties for:

(a) The development, purchase, administration, scoring, and reporting of scores of the assessments established by the Washington professional educator standards board under subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section;

(b) Related clerical and administrative activities; or

(c) Any combination of the purposes in this subsection.

(8) Applicants for admission to a Washington teacher preparation program and applicants for residency and professional certificates who are required to successfully complete one or more of the assessments under subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section, and who are charged a fee for the assessment by a third party contracted with under subsection (7) of this section, shall pay the fee charged by the contractor directly to the contractor. Such fees shall be reasonably related to the actual costs of the contractor in providing the assessment.

(9) The superintendent of public instruction is responsible for supervision and providing support services to administer this section.

(10) The Washington professional educator standards board shall collaboratively select or develop and implement the applicable assessments and minimum assessment scores required under this section with the superintendent of public instruction and shall provide opportunities for representatives of other interested educational organizations to participate in the selection or development and implementation of such assessments in a manner deemed appropriate by the Washington professional educator standards board.

(11) The Washington professional educator standards board shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW that are reasonably necessary for the effective and efficient implementation of this section.

[ 2019 c 121 s 1; 2013 c 193 s 2; 2008 c 176 s 2; 2002 c 92 s 2; 2000 c 39 s 201.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2013 c 193: "The legislature finds that the use of a basic skills test as an entrance requirement to teacher certification programs has unintentionally created a barrier to the effective recruitment of candidates from underrepresented populations who are otherwise qualified for the program. Therefore, the legislature intends to expand the pool of potential teacher candidates by expanding the types of testing instruments and assessments that may be used to measure basic skills. The legislature intends to review any alternative assessments to ensure that candidates must continue to meet the established standards for admission to a teacher certification program." [ 2013 c 193 s 1.]

Findings—Part headings and section captions not law—2000 c 39: See notes following RCW 28A.410.200.